Hawaii statutes.
§249-34 Delinquent penalties; seizure and
sale for tax and fee. Any tax or fee imposed under sections 249-31 and
249-33 for any year and not paid when due shall be subject to the penalties
provided in section 249-10. [L 1978, c 159, §4; am L 1981, c 50, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next